Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-522
Class V school district; board of education; officers; rules and regulations; testimony; power to compel.

The board of education of a Class V school district has power to select its own officers and make its rules and regulations. The board or any committee of the members of the board has power to compel the attendance of witnesses for the investigation of matters that may come before it. The presiding officer of the board or the chairperson of such committee for the time being may administer the requisite oaths, and such board or committee has the same authority to compel the giving of testimony as is conferred on courts of justice.

Laws 1891, c. 45, § 7, p. 319;

R.S.1913, § 7015;

C.S.1922, § 6646;

C.S.1929, § 79-2709;

R.S.1943, § 79-2709;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 255, p. 777;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1003.04;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 275.

The board of education is authorized to make rules and regulations. Galstan v. School Dist. of Omaha, 177 Neb. 319, 128 N.W.2d 790 (1964).